West Virginia, session 2026, HB4962.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. ENFORCEMENT AND ADMINISTRATIVE PROVISIONS. §60A-5-510. Drug related nuisances. (a) Any property, in whole or in part, used or intended to be used to facilitate any violation of this chapter or any similar ordinance of any municipality in this state or a similar act of the United States or any other state or the use, sale, distribution, possession, storage, transportation, or manufacture of any controlled substances in violation of this chapter, or similar act of the United States or any other state, is a public nuisance and may be proceeded against under this section.  (b) If a nuisance exists, county or municipality where the property is located may maintain an action in the circuit court to abate the nuisance and to perpetually enjoin every person guilty of creating or maintaining the nuisance, the owner, lessee or tenant of the building or structure where the nuisance exists and the owner of the land upon which the building or structure is located, from continuing, maintaining or permitting the nuisance.  (c) If the existence of the nuisance is shown in the action to the satisfaction of the court, either by verified complaint or affidavit, the court shall issue a temporary injunction to abate and prevent the continuance or recurrence of the nuisance, including the issuance of an order requiring the closure of the property. Any temporary injunction issued in an action begun under this subsection shall be issued without requiring a security bond. (d) In ruling upon a request for closure, whether for a defined or undefined duration, the court shall consider all of the following factors:(1) The extent and duration of the nuisance at the time of the request.(2) Prior efforts by the defendant to comply with previous court orders to abate the nuisance.(3) The nature and extent of any effect that the nuisance has upon other persons, such as residents or businesses.(4) The effect of granting the request upon any resident or occupant of the premises who is not named in the action, including the availability of alternative housing or relocation assistance, the pendency of any action to evict a resident or occupant and any evidence of participation by a resident or occupant in the nuisance activity. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home